Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2822
Writ; order for safekeeping of person detained.

When any writ of habeas corpus shall have been allowed, the court or judge to which the same shall be returned, or into which it shall be adjourned, shall, for good cause shown, continue the cause and shall make order for the safekeeping of the person imprisoned, or detain him, as the nature of the case may require.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 374, p. 809;

R.S.1913, § 9268;

C.S.1922, § 10297;

C.S.1929, § 29-2822;

R.S.1943, § 29-2822.